Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-301
Act, how cited.

Sections 90-301 to 90-309 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska State Capitol Environs Act.

Laws 1977, LB 172, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 962, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 271, § 1.